Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 11.4 Rhode Island Certification Standards Board
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-11.4-1.
Legislative intent.

The general assembly recognizes that teaching and the rendering of other professional educational services in the pre-kindergarten through grade twelve (12) of public schools in this state affect the public interest. The general assembly further recognizes the importance of governing the preparation, licensure, and regulation of public school teachers and administrators through policies for teacher and administrator certification that maintain the highest professional standards and that are promulgated by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education with full input from those practicing in the profession.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 188, § 1.

16-11.4-2.
Policy advisory board on teacher and administrator certification — Establishment — Composition.

There is hereby established a policy advisory board on teacher and administrator certification to consist of eleven (11) members: two (2) of whom shall be representatives of the Rhode Island Federation of Teachers and Health Professionals; two (2) of whom shall be representatives of the National Education Association of Rhode Island; two (2) of whom shall be members of the Association of Independent Colleges and Universities of Rhode Island (AICU Rhode Island); one of whom shall be a representative of the University of Rhode Island School of Education; one of whom shall be a representative of the Rhode Island College School of Education; one of whom shall be a representative of the Rhode Island Association of School Principals; one of whom shall be a representative of the Rhode Island Association of School Administrators; and one of whom shall be the commissioner of higher education, or his or her designee. The director of the department of elementary and secondary education office of teacher preparation, certification and professional development shall be non-voting ex-officio to the board. The policy advisory board shall advise the commissioners of elementary and secondary education and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education on the development of all policies, rules, and regulations relating to the certification of teachers and administrators.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 129, § 1.

16-11.4-3.
Policy advisory board on teacher and administrator certification — Meetings — Staff support.

The policy advisory board on teacher and administrator certification shall hold regular meetings not less than ten (10) per year. The board shall hold additional special meetings as it deems necessary. Special meetings may be called by the commissioners of the department of elementary and secondary education, or by the request for a meeting of at least four (4) members. The presence of a majority of members shall constitute a quorum for transaction of business. All meetings of the board shall be open and public, except that the board may call an executive session as provided for in chapter 46 of title 42.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide all necessary staff and logistical support to the board to enable the board to carry out its function.

The provisions of chapter 46 of title 42 shall apply to all meetings of this board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 188, § 1.

16-11.4-4.
Policy advisory board on teacher and administrative certification — General powers and duties.

The advisory board shall:

Recommend to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and to the council on elementary and secondary education standards for obtaining and maintaining a certificate of qualifications;

Recommend to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and to the council on elementary and secondary education standards for the revocation or suspension of a certificate of qualifications and the standards for the reinstatement of a suspended or revoked certificate of qualifications;

Recommend to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and to the council on elementary and secondary education the adoption or revision of rules and regulations consistent with law as may be necessary to regulate teacher and administrator certification pursuant to chapter 11 of this title;

Recommend to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, commissioner of postsecondary education and to the councils on elementary and secondary education and postsecondary education standards for teacher and administrator preparation programs in this state and standards for the evaluation of teacher and administrator preparation programs in this state. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the commissioner of postsecondary education shall provide a report to the presidents of the university of Rhode Island and Rhode Island college, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives that outlines the recommendations of the advisory board and what, if any, action was taken by October 31, 2017.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 292, § 1.

16-11.4-5.
Conformance with the Administrative Procedures Act.

Pursuant to §

16-60-10

, the board of regents of elementary and secondary education shall conform to the rulemaking requirements of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42, in implementing this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 188, § 1.

16-11.4-6.
Right to read act.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Right to Read Act.”

No later than 2025, the following shall have proficient knowledge and skills to teach reading consistent with the best practices of scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction:

A person who completes a state-approved educator preparation program; and

A person seeking teacher licensure by reciprocity or by adding an endorsement.

In addition, no later than 2025, a person who completes a state-approved educator preparation program, other than a teacher of elementary education program, shall demonstrate an awareness of the best practices of scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction.

Beginning no later than the 2024-2025 school year, each state-approved educator preparation program shall post on its website information describing its program to prepare teachers to teach reading with scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction; aligned with, but not limited to, the content measured by the stand-alone reading assessment adopted by the Rhode Island board of education act.

Beginning with the 2020-2021 school year, a public school district and an open-enrollment public charter school shall provide the following professional development in scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction:

For teachers licensed at the elementary level, professional development for one of the prescribed pathways to obtaining a proficiency credential in knowledge and practices in scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction; and

For teachers licensed at a level other than the elementary level, professional development for one of the prescribed pathways to obtaining an awareness credential in knowledge and practices in scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction.

Beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, a public school that does not provide the professional development pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d) shall:

Be placed on probationary status; and

Provide notice to parents that the public school district has not met the requirements of this section.

By the beginning of the 2025-2026 school year:

All teachers employed in a teaching position that requires an elementary education (K-6) license or (K-12) license shall demonstrate proficiency in knowledge and practices of scientific reading and structured literacy instruction; and

All other teachers shall demonstrate awareness in knowledge and practices of scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction.

All teachers who begin employment in the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter shall demonstrate proficiency or awareness in knowledge and practices in scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction as is applicable to their teaching position by completing the prescribed proficiency or awareness in knowledge and practices of the scientific reading instruction credential and a structured literacy instruction credential either:

As a condition of licensure; or

Within one year if the teacher is:

Already licensed; or

Employed under a waiver from licensure.

A provider of a state-approved educator preparation program shall include in its annual report to the department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) a description of program to prepare educators to teach reading using scientific reading instruction and structured literacy instruction.

A public school district that employs an educator in violation of this section or that does not provide the professional development as required under this section shall be in violation of the standards for accreditation of the Rhode Island board of education act, and the school district may be placed on probationary status by the department. A public school district placed on probationary status pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall send written notification to the parents of the students in the public school district of the reason for being placed on probationary status.

A provider of a state-approved educator preparation program that does not comply with the requirements of this section may be subject to penalties up to and including having the provider’s approval status revoked.

The department is vested with the authority to, and shall enforce, this section.

The department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section no later than August 1, 2022.

The rules and regulations adopted by the department shall recognize that teachers shall have met the requirement of demonstrating awareness in knowledge and practices of scientific reading and structured literacy instruction by attending ten (10) hours of training in scientific reading and structured literacy instruction.

The rules and regulations adopted by the department shall recognize that teachers shall have met the requirement of demonstrating proficiency in knowledge and practices of scientific reading and structured literacy instruction by one of the following:

Possessing a Master’s degree in reading or a related academic discipline;

Possessing a reading specialist and/or consultant certificate;

Providing proof of completion of a course or training program in scientific reading and structured literacy instruction consisting of at least thirty (30) hours; or

Passing a test in scientific reading and structured literacy instruction adopted by the department at no cost to the teacher.

Teachers shall not be required to attend training sessions outside the normal workday and work year unless mutually agreed to by the teacher, the school district, and the collective bargaining agent if applicable.

For the 2022-2023, 2023-2024, and 2024-2025 school years, school districts shall be able to replace up to three (3) student instructional days per year with teacher professional development days in order to meet the requirements of this section.

As used in this section:

The term “scientific reading instruction” means instruction that is instructional centered, empirically based, and further based on the study of the relationship between cognitive science and educational outcomes; and

The term “structured literacy instruction” means an approach by which licensed personnel teach reading, which includes syllables, morphology, sound-symbol correspondence, semantics, and syntax, in an explicit, systematic, and diagnostic manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 6; P.L. 2022, ch. 267, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 323, § 1, effective July 6, 2022.